Utah statutes.
41-1a-512.   Application for title.
(1)  The application for a certificate of title shall include:
(a)  the signature of a person to be recorded on the certificate as owner;
(b)  the name, bona fide residence and mailing address of the owner, or
business address of the owner if the owner is a firm, association, or
corporation;
(c)  a description of the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor, including the
make, model, type of body, the model year as specified by the manufacturer,
the number of cylinders, the identification number of the vehicle, vessel, or
outboard motor, as applicable, and other information the division may require;
(d)  other information required by the division to enable it to determine
whether the owner is entitled to a certificate of title;
(e)  a statement of one lien or encumbrance, if any, upon the vehicle, vessel,
or outboard motor; and
(f)  the names and addresses of all persons having any ownership interest in
the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor and the nature of the ownership
interest.
(2)  An application for a certificate of title for a new vehicle, vessel, or
outboard motor purchased from a dealer shall be accompanied by a statement by
the dealer or a bill of sale showing any lien retained by the dealer.
